District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.118

Application of chapter to foreign corporations transacting business on chapter’s effective date.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 227, ch. 269, § 118
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.118.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.19.
1973 Ed., § 29-934e.